Massachusetts, session 194th, H3682.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the city of
Boston shall change the name of the American Legion Highway, a road in the city that connects
Hyde Park avenue with Blue Hill Avenue, to American Legion Parkway. The city shall erect and
maintain suitable markers bearing the name.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1